Tennessee, session 114, SB1447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 125 of the Private Acts of 1949, as amended by Chapter 291
of the Private Acts of 1957, Chapter 134 of the Private Acts of 1994, and any other acts
amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting Section 9 and substituting the following:
Section 9. Effective September 1, 2030, the annual salary of all general
sessions judges of Putnam County is set at an amount equal to the amount
received annually by the circuit court judges and chancellors of Putnam County.
On September 1, 2030, and every September 1 thereafter, the annual salary of all
the general sessions judges of Putnam County must be adjusted in accordance
with the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-23-103(2) and
Section 16-15-5003. The salary provided for the general sessions judges must be
paid in twelve (12) equal installments. Further, any and all private acts, and/or
part thereof applicable to Putnam County, Tennessee, in conflict herewith is
repealed.
SECTION 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter the salary of any
incumbent prior to the end of the term for which such elected official was selected, as
prescribed in Article XI, Section 9 of the Constitution of the State of Tennessee.
SECTION 3. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds
(2/3) vote of the legislative body of Putnam County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be
proclaimed by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of
SB1447
001814
- 1 -

state.
SECTION 4. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act,
it shall be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other
purposes, it shall become effective as provided in Section 3.
- 2 - 001814